Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.897

Mobile home, manufactured home, or park model moving or installing—Copies of permits—Definitions.

(1) A city or town shall transmit a copy of any permit issued to a tenant or the tenant's agent for a mobile home, manufactured home, or park model installation in a mobile home park to the landlord.

(2) A city or town shall transmit a copy of any permit issued to a person engaged in the business of moving or installing a mobile home, manufactured home, or park model in a mobile home park to the tenant and the landlord.

(3) As used in this section:

(a) "Landlord" has the same meaning as in RCW 59.20.030;

(b) "Mobile home park" has the same meaning as in RCW 59.20.030;

(c) "Mobile or manufactured home installation" has the same meaning as in *RCW 43.63B.010; and

(d) "Tenant" has the same meaning as in RCW 59.20.030.

[ 1999 c 359 s 18.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.63B.010 was recodified as RCW 43.22A.010 pursuant to 2007 c 432 s 13.

Effective date—1999 c 359: See RCW 59.20.901.